Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1306
Unresolved dispute; submitted to arbitration; rules applicable.

If the dispute remains unresolved forty-five days after the receipt by the supplier of the notice in writing of such dispute and payment of the full amount of the charge as provided in section 70-1304 has been made, the dispute shall be submitted to arbitration in accordance with sections 70-1301 to 70-1329.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 70-1301 to 70-1329, the Commercial Arbitration Rules of the American Arbitration Association, as amended and in effect March 1, 1977, shall be used to the extent that they are determined by the arbitration board to be applicable to the procedures set forth in sections 70-1301 to 70-1329. The Administrative Fee Schedule contained in such rules shall not apply.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 6.

This section makes the Commercial Arbitration Rules of the American Arbitration Association, as amended and in effect March 1, 1977, the default procedural rules governing arbitration. City of Sidney v. Municipal Energy Agency of Neb., 301 Neb. 147, 917 N.W.2d 826 (2018).

This section provides an arbitration board with the authority to allow a party to amend its notice, substantive or not, at any time in the arbitrative proceedings. City of Sidney v. Municipal Energy Agency of Neb., 301 Neb. 147, 917 N.W.2d 826 (2018).